District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

24-201.41

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Nov. 14, 1987, D.C. Law 7-43, § 2, 34 DCR 5287
Nov 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 1802(a), 50 DCR 5668
Jan. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-62, § 7, 50 DCR 6574

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-901.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1802(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1802(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).

Short Title

Short title of title XVIII of Law 15-39: Section 1801 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that title XVIII of the act may be cited as the Department of Corrections Procurement of Jail Bed Space Amendment Act of 2003.